Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) There is hereby created as a cabinet agency of the governor, the office of Indian affairs.(2) The office of Indian affairs shall have the following responsibilities:(a) Assist the governor in the development and review of effective policies and legislation to support the state of Washington in fostering strong and meaningful relationships with federally recognized Indian tribes, whose traditional lands and territories included parts of Washington as described in RCW 43.376.010, tribal organizations, and urban Indian organizations;(b) In accordance with RCW 43.376.020, provide a training focused on fostering effective communication and collaboration between the state and federally recognized Indian tribes, whose traditional lands and territories included parts of Washington as described in RCW 43.376.010, which the heads of each executive and small cabinet agency, and each of the governor's policy advisors and executive leadership team members, shall attend;(c)(i) In partnership with relevant agencies including the department of enterprise services, the office of financial management state human resources, and agency tribal liaisons, expand upon RCW 43.376.020 to produce additional training for state employees.(ii) The office of Indian affairs shall consult with tribal nations in the development of the training.(iii) The training shall be made available to state employees in an accessible manner, including but not limited to an electronic, digital format to facilitate access for state employees.(iv) Cabinet agencies shall work with the office of Indian affairs to determine appropriate staff and timing to receive the training;(d) Advise state agencies and departments concerning issues relative to federally recognized Indian tribes, whose traditional lands and territories included parts of Washington as described in RCW 43.376.010, and Indian organizations of Washington state;(e) Be the governor's liaison between the state of Washington, Indian tribal governments, and Indian organizations;(f) Be liaison and advisor to the governor and state agencies on federal and state legislation and policies in Indian affairs;(g) In collaboration with state agency tribal liaisons, provide assistance and advice to state agencies, departments, boards, and commissions concerning tribal relationships and issues impacting tribal rights, communities, lands, and interests, and other American Indian or Alaskan Native residents and communities of Washington state;(h) Regularly convene meetings with tribal nations and relevant state parties to discuss issues of mutual interest in a timely manner; and(i) Facilitate and convene meetings with tribal leaders annually to implement the Centennial Accords, including the development of the agenda, identifying joint strategies, and achieving specific goals.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) The executive head of the office of Indian affairs shall be the executive director, who shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and serve at the pleasure of the governor as part of the governor's executive cabinet. He or she shall be paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040. (2) The executive director shall employ a staff, who shall be state employees pursuant to Title 41 RCW. The executive director shall prescribe the duties of the staff as may be necessary to implement the purposes of this chapter and may delegate such of his or her powers, duties, and functions to other officers and employees of the office as he or she may deem necessary to the fulfillment of the purposes of this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) The legislature hereby finds and declares that nothing in this chapter, including, without limitation, the creation of the office of Indian affairs, is intended to infringe upon the sovereignty of Indian tribes who are federally recognized by the United States as possessing powers of self-government and whose traditional lands and territories included parts of Washington as described in RCW 43.376.010.(2) Indians subject to the jurisdiction of the state of Washington pursuant to the provisions of Title 9A RCW and chapter 37.12 RCW are entitled to all services of the state of Washington including, without limitation, correctional legal aid, public defender, probational and psychiatric services afforded to any other persons who are defendants in criminal actions or parties to civil actions in the courts of this state.(3) The provisions of Title 9A RCW and chapter 37.12 RCW do not preclude Indian tribes, who are federally recognized by the United States as possessing powers of self-government and whose traditional lands and territories included parts of Washington as described in RCW 43.376.010, from enacting their own laws, regulations, and ordinances, and enforcing them by their own tribal courts in accordance with their rules of procedure.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. The office of Indian affairs may establish procedures and requirements for operations and expenditures to support and enhance state government partnership and relationships with tribal nations. Such operations and expenditures are intended to strengthen state-tribal relations and provide resources for government-to-government engagement. The office of Indian affairs may accept or request grants or gifts from citizens and other private sources to be used to defray the costs of appropriate hosting of state-tribal relations gatherings, including appropriate gift giving and reciprocal gift receiving, or other activities of the office. The office shall open and maintain a bank account into which it shall deposit all money received under this section. Such money and the interest accruing thereon shall not constitute public funds, shall be kept segregated and apart from funds of the state, and shall not be subject to appropriation or allotment by the state or subject to chapter 43.88 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. (1) On or before November 1st of each year, the office of Indian affairs shall prepare and submit to the governor and the legislature an annual written report of the operations, activities, programs, and services of the office for the preceding fiscal year.(2) For each operation, activity, program, or service provided by the office of Indian affairs, the annual report shall include:(a) A description of the operation, activity, program, or service;(b) Budget data, including the amount and source of funding, expenses, and allocation of full-time employees for the operation, activity, program, or service;(c) Goals, challenges, and achievements related to the operation, activity, program, or service;(d) Relevant federal and state statutory references and requirements; and(e) Other information determined by the office of Indian affairs that:(i) May be needed, useful, or of historical significance; or(ii) Promotes accountability and transparency for each operation, activity, program, or service with the public and elected officials.(3) The annual report shall be designed to provide clear, accurate, and accessible information to the public, the governor, and the legislature.(4) The office of Indian affairs shall:(a) Submit the annual report in accordance with RCW 43.01.036; and(b) Make the annual report, and previous annual reports, accessible to the public by placing a link to the reports on the office's website.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 5 of this act are each added to chapter 43.376 RCW.--- END ---